Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
PART 1 COLORADO SCHOOL OF MINES
23-41-114. Colorado energy research institute - creation.

There is hereby created at the Colorado school of mines the Colorado energy research institute, which shall be referred to in this section as the "institute". It is the intent of this section that the institute serve as a mechanism for the development of energy and energy-related minerals research programs, including programs at single state or private educational or research institutions and multidisciplinary, interuniversity, government-university, and industry-university energy and energy-related minerals research programs and projects. It is the further intent of this section that the institute provide the mechanism for enhancing the development and promotion of energy and energy-related minerals education programs in the state.

The principal administrative officer of the institute shall be the president of the Colorado school of mines, and budgetary and fiscal procedures and activities of the institute shall be under the supervision of the Colorado school of mines.

It is the duty of the institute to:

Maintain liaison with the state to identify the important regional energy and energy-related minerals problems, including their relationship to the use of the waters of the state;

Solicit and determine, through inquiry of and consultation with the executive and legislative branches of the state government and with local governments, the needs of the said branches and governments for energy data and background information relating to the determination of state policy and actions in relation to energy shortages, planning, and long-range options, and to collect, maintain, and provide such data and background material;

Promote the development of energy and energy-related minerals research programs and projects in single or multiple disciplines at state and private educational and research institutions;

Administer a phase-out program of energy grants to enrolled undergraduates within the higher education system;

Develop and promote energy and energy-related minerals education programs in the state;

Administer programs of public education in energy development, utilization, and conservation, which shall include, but shall not be limited to, energy status reports, sponsorship of symposia, demonstration programs, and reports on research results;

Contract for and to accept any gifts or grants or loans or funds or property or financial or other aid in any form from the United States or any agency or instrumentality thereof, or from the state or any executive or legislative agency thereof, or from any other source and to comply, subject to the provisions of this article, with the terms and conditions thereof, and to have the authority to expend such funds.

Repealed.

The institute shall conduct:

Regular, mutual consultations about its progress in meeting the goals set forth in this section with the department of natural resources; and

The following specific research and educational programs designed to meet the information needs of the department of natural resources, other agencies of the state's executive branch, the legislature, and the public:

The collection of primary data on the economic impact of energy industries, emphasizing oil and gas, on municipalities and counties; the establishment of an energy economics database to be housed and maintained in the Colorado school of mines division of economics and business and the establishment of internet access to such database; the development of reliable means of forecasting by the institute's program in energy economics; and support for the analysis, interpretation, and periodic publication of the findings of the economic analysis.

For the purposes authorized by this subparagraph (I), up to five hundred thousand dollars of the unencumbered balance available in the oil and gas conservation and environmental response fund created in section 34-60-122 (5), C.R.S., may be expended.

The development of research in those sectors of geoscience and engineering that are most critical to the formation of renewable energy and continued enhanced production of natural gas and oil from Rocky Mountain reservoirs, including production optimization and resource distribution and synergies with renewable resources.

For the purpose authorized by this subparagraph (II), up to one million dollars of the unencumbered balance available in the oil and gas conservation and environmental response fund created in section 34-60-122 (5), C.R.S., may be expended.

Of the amount specified in sub-subparagraph (B) of this subparagraph (II): Five hundred thousand dollars may be expended in the state fiscal year beginning July 1, 2005; and five hundred thousand dollars may be expended in the state fiscal year beginning July 1, 2006, if an estimate made on or about May 1, 2006, of the projected unencumbered balance that will be available in the oil and gas conservation and environmental response fund on July 1, 2006, exceeds two and one-half million dollars.

To inform the public, legislative and regulatory bodies, and working professionals about new technologies and their relationship to traditional sources of energy to promote the public's understanding of how its everyday energy needs are met.

For the purpose authorized by this subparagraph (III), up to three hundred seventy-five thousand dollars of the unencumbered balance available in the oil and gas conservation and environmental response fund created in section 34-60-122 (5), C.R.S., may be expended.

Of the amount specified in sub-subparagraph (B) of this subparagraph (III): One hundred seventy-five thousand dollars may be expended in the state fiscal year beginning July 1, 2005; and two hundred thousand dollars may be expended in the state fiscal year beginning July 1, 2006, if an estimate made on or about May 1, 2006, of the projected unencumbered balance that will be available in the oil and gas conservation and environmental response fund on July 1, 2006, exceeds two and one-half million dollars.

To facilitate economic development by funding local community colleges, colleges, area technical colleges, and vocational schools in regions where energy development is occurring and by providing grants for job training and education resources to advance knowledge and skill development that goes beyond basic research and helps attract, educate, and train people for employment.

For the purpose authorized by this subparagraph (IV), up to one million dollars of the unencumbered balance available in the oil and gas conservation and environmental response fund created in section 34-60-122 (5), C.R.S., may be expended.

Of the amount specified in sub-subparagraph (B) of this subparagraph (IV): Five hundred thousand dollars may be expended in the state fiscal year beginning July 1, 2005; and five hundred thousand dollars may be expended in the state fiscal year beginning July 1, 2006, if an estimate made on or about May 1, 2006, of the projected unencumbered balance that will be available in the oil and gas conservation and environmental response fund on July 1, 2006, exceeds two and one-half million dollars.

To pay the membership dues of the energy council referred to in section 2-3-311 (2)(b), C.R.S.

For the purpose authorized by this subparagraph (V), up to fifty six thousand dollars of the unencumbered balance available in the oil and gas conservation and environmental response fund created in section 34-60-122 (5), C.R.S., may be expended.

To provide grants for the development of a central resource for building trade professionals, including contractors, engineers, architects, and designers, for the purpose of increasing available tools and education to advance energy-efficient design and construction.

For the purpose authorized by this subparagraph (VI), up to one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars of the unencumbered balance available in the oil and gas conservation and environmental response fund created in section 34-60-122 (5), C.R.S., may be expended.

Of the amount specified in sub-subparagraph (B) of this subparagraph (VI): Seventy-five thousand dollars may be expended in the state fiscal year beginning July 1, 2005; and fifty thousand dollars may be expended in the state fiscal year beginning July 1, 2006, if an estimate made on or about May 1, 2006, of the projected unencumbered balance that will be available in the oil and gas conservation and environmental response fund on July 1, 2006, exceeds two and one-half million dollars.

Source:

L. 74:

Entire section added, p. 382, § 1, effective May 8.

L. 77:

(3)(g) to (3)(j) added, p. 1118, § 1, effective June 2; (6) added by revision, p. 1118, § 2.

L. 83:

Entire section RC&RE, p. 808, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(3)(h) repealed, p. 1240, § 94, effective August 7.

L. 2005:

(4) added, p. 539, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(4)(b)(I)(B), (4)(b)(II)(B), (4)(b)(II)(C), (4)(b)(III)(B), (4)(b)(III)(C), (4)(b)(IV)(B), (4)(b)(IV)(C), (4)(b)(V)(B), (4)(b)(VI)(B), and (4)(b)(VI)(C) amended, p. 1498, § 32, effective June 1.

L. 2008:

(4)(b)(VI)(A) amended, p. 69, § 5, effective March 18.

L. 2012:

(4)(b)(VI)(A) amended, (HB 12-1315), ch. 224, p. 962, § 14, effective July 1.

L. 2016:

(4)(b)(IV)(A) amended, (HB 16-1082), ch. 58, p. 154, § 47, effective August 10.

L. 2018:

(4)(b)(VI)(A) amended, (SB 18-003), ch. 359, p. 2132, § 4, effective June 1.

23-41-115. Advisory council on energy-related minerals research. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 74:

Entire section added, p. 383, § 1, effective May 8.

L. 77:

(5) added by revision, p. 1118, § 2.

23-41-115.5. Legislative declaration. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 77:

Entire section added, p. 1118, § 2, effective June 2.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 1982. (See L. 77, p. 1118.)

23-41-116. Rents or charges for buildings and facilities for research.

The board of trustees is authorized to contract for or impose and collect rents or charges for the use of Colorado school of mines' buildings and facilities for research, including research conducted by or under the auspices of the Colorado school of mines. Such rents or charges shall be at a level reasonably calculated to return or amortize the cost of such buildings and facilities within a reasonable period not exceeding the life of such buildings and facilities; but such user charges or rents may not be imposed and collected in such a manner as to require payment directly or indirectly from the state general fund, tuition receipts, or student fees.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire section added, p. 1120, § 1, effective May 16.

23-41-117. Research building revolving fund - appropriation of fund.

There is established in the office of the state treasurer the Colorado school of mines research building revolving fund, and there shall be credited to said fund the user charges or rents authorized by section 23-41-116 and imposed by the board of trustees, specific appropriations or grants or gifts made to said fund, and the proceeds of the sale of anticipation warrants authorized by section 23-41-118. All such moneys so credited to said fund are appropriated to the Colorado school of mines for the planning, constructing, and equipping of additional research buildings and facilities for the Colorado school of mines.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire section added, p. 1120, § 1, effective May 16.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 1240, § 95, effective August 7.

L. 99:

Entire section amended, p. 853, § 15, effective May 24.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1996 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 237, Session Laws of Colorado 1996.

23-41-118. Anticipation warrants.

The state treasurer is authorized to issue anticipation warrants in such amounts as requested by the board of trustees, the total amount of which shall not exceed one million dollars, to be repaid exclusively from the user revenues accruing to the Colorado school of mines research building revolving fund as provided in this section and sections 23-41-116 and 23-41-117. The anticipation warrants shall bear interest at a rate not exceeding six percent per annum and shall not be sold at a price less than the face value thereof. Disbursements from said fund shall be only by warrant upon vouchers certified by the board of trustees.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire section added, p. 1121, § 1, effective May 16.

23-41-119. Purchase of anticipation warrants.

It is lawful for the state of Colorado, the state treasurer, any department, institution, or agency of the state, or any political subdivision of the state to purchase anticipation warrants issued pursuant to section 23-41-118 if such warrants satisfy the investment requirements established in part 6 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S.; but not more than twenty percent of the total of any specific fund of the state or any of its departments, institutions, agencies, or political subdivisions shall be invested in such warrants.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire section added, p. 1121, § 1, effective May 16.

L. 89:

Entire section amended, p. 1128, § 63, effective July 1.

23-41-120. Warrants as security - when.

Anticipation warrants issued pursuant to section 23-41-118 may be used as security for any depository bond or obligation where any kind of bonds or other securities must or may, by law, be deposited as security.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire section added, p. 1121, § 1, effective May 16.

23-41-121. Tax exemption.

Any anticipation warrants issued pursuant to the provisions of section 23-41-118 by the board of trustees shall be exempt from taxation for state, county, school district, special district, municipal, or any other purpose in the state of Colorado.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire section added, p. 1121, § 1, effective May 16.

23-41-122. Borrowing funds.

For the purpose of obtaining funds for the planning, constructing, and equipping of research buildings and facilities for the Colorado school of mines, the board of trustees is authorized to enter into contracts with any person, corporation, or state or federal government agency for the advancement of money for such purposes and providing for the repayment of such advances with interest from the Colorado school of mines research building revolving fund.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire section added, p. 1121, § 1, effective May 16.

23-41-123. Moneys from Colorado school of mines lands.

All moneys that arise from the sale of lands belonging to the Colorado school of mines, or from the leasing of lands belonging to the said school, or from interest arising on the investment of such funds are placed under the exclusive control of the board of trustees of the Colorado school of mines. The state treasurer is instructed to turn over to the board of trustees all the moneys, warrants, bonds, and other securities of any nature that have come from the sale of said lands belonging to said school.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire section added, p. 860, § 1, effective April 22.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 396, § 2, effective August 2.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (HB 13-1297), ch. 260, p. 1373, § 3, effective August 7.